searchsrv/searchengine/oss/sb/snowball/algorithms/french/stem_ISO_8859_1.sbl
/*

Copyright (c) 2001, Dr Martin Porter
Copyright (c) 2002, Richard Boulton
All rights reserved.

Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with 
or without modification, are permitted provided that the 
following conditions are met:

*	Redistributions of source code must retain the 
	above copyright notice, this list of conditions and 
	the following disclaimer. 
*	Redistributions in binary form must reproduce 
	above copyright notice, this list of conditions and
 	the following disclaimer in the documentation and/or 
	other materials provided with the distribution. 
*	Neither the name of the <ORGANIZATION> nor the 
	names of its contributors may be used to endorse or 
	promote products derived from this software without
	specific rior written permission. 

THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY THE COPYRIGHT HOLDERS AND 
CONTRIBUTORS "AS IS" AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, 
INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF 
MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE 
DISCLAIMED. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE COPYRIGHT OWNER OR 
CONTRIBUTORS BE LIABLE FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, 
SPECIAL, EXEMPLARY, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING, 
BUT NOT LIMITED TO, PROCUREMENT OF SUBSTITUTE GOODS OR 
SERVICES; LOSS OF USE, DATA, OR PROFITS; OR BUSINESS 
INTERRUPTION) HOWEVER CAUSED AND ON ANY THEORY OF LIABILITY, 
WHETHER IN CONTRACT, STRICT LIABILITY, OR TORT (INCLUDING 
NEGLIGENCE OR OTHERWISE) ARISING IN ANY WAY OUT OF THE USE 
OF THIS SOFTWARE, EVEN IF ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH 
DAMAGE.

*/

routines (
           prelude postlude mark_regions
           RV R1 R2
           standard_suffix
           i_verb_suffix
           verb_suffix
           residual_suffix
           un_double
           un_accent
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( pV p1 p2 )

groupings ( v keep_with_s )

stringescapes {}

/* special characters (in ISO Latin I) */

stringdef a^   hex 'E2'  // a-circumflex
stringdef a`   hex 'E0'  // a-grave
stringdef c,   hex 'E7'  // c-cedilla

stringdef e"   hex 'EB'  // e-diaeresis (rare)
stringdef e'   hex 'E9'  // e-acute
stringdef e^   hex 'EA'  // e-circumflex
stringdef e`   hex 'E8'  // e-grave
stringdef i"   hex 'EF'  // i-diaeresis
stringdef i^   hex 'EE'  // i-circumflex
stringdef o^   hex 'F4'  // o-circumflex
stringdef u^   hex 'FB'  // u-circumflex
stringdef u`   hex 'F9'  // u-grave

define v 'aeiouy{a^}{a`}{e"}{e'}{e^}{e`}{i"}{i^}{o^}{u^}{u`}'

define prelude as repeat goto (

    (  v [ ('u' ] v <- 'U') or
           ('i' ] v <- 'I') or
           ('y' ] <- 'Y')
    )
    or
    (  ['y'] v <- 'Y' )
    or
    (  'q' ['u'] <- 'U' )
)

define mark_regions as (

    $pV = limit
    $p1 = limit
    $p2 = limit  // defaults

    do (
        ( v v next )
        or
        among ( // this exception list begun Nov 2006
            'par'  // paris, parie, pari
            'col'  // colis
            'tap'  // tapis
            // extensions possible here
        )
        or
        ( next gopast v )
        setmark pV
    )
    do (
        gopast v gopast non-v setmark p1
        gopast v gopast non-v setmark p2
    )
)

define postlude as repeat (

    [substring] among(
        'I' (<- 'i')
        'U' (<- 'u')
        'Y' (<- 'y')
        ''  (next)
    )
)

backwardmode (

    define RV as $pV <= cursor
    define R1 as $p1 <= cursor
    define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

    define standard_suffix as (
        [substring] among(

            'ance' 'iqUe' 'isme' 'able' 'iste' 'eux'
            'ances' 'iqUes' 'ismes' 'ables' 'istes'
               ( R2 delete )
            'atrice' 'ateur' 'ation'
            'atrices' 'ateurs' 'ations'
               ( R2 delete
                 try ( ['ic'] (R2 delete) or <-'iqU' )
               )
            'logie'
            'logies'
               ( R2 <- 'log' )
            'usion' 'ution'
            'usions' 'utions'
               ( R2 <- 'u' )
            'ence'
            'ences'
               ( R2 <- 'ent' )
            'ement'
            'ements'
            (
                RV delete
                try (
                    [substring] among(
                        'iv'   (R2 delete ['at'] R2 delete)
                        'eus'  ((R2 delete) or (R1<-'eux'))
                        'abl' 'iqU'
                               (R2 delete)
                        'i{e`}r' 'I{e`}r'      //)
                               (RV <-'i')      //)--new 2 Sept 02
                    )
                )
            )
            'it{e'}'
            'it{e'}s'
            (
                R2 delete
                try (
                    [substring] among(
                        'abil' ((R2 delete) or <-'abl')
                        'ic'   ((R2 delete) or <-'iqU')
                        'iv'   (R2 delete)
                    )
                )
            )
            'if' 'ive'
            'ifs' 'ives'
            (
                R2 delete
                try ( ['at'] R2 delete ['ic'] (R2 delete) or <-'iqU' )
            )
            'eaux' (<- 'eau')
            'aux'  (R1 <- 'al')
            'euse'
            'euses'((R2 delete) or (R1<-'eux'))

            'issement'
            'issements'(R1 non-v delete) // verbal

            // fail(...) below forces entry to verb_suffix. -ment typically
            // follows the p.p., e.g 'confus{e'}ment'.

            'amment'   (RV fail(<- 'ant'))
            'emment'   (RV fail(<- 'ent'))
            'ment'
            'ments'    (test(v RV) fail(delete))
                       // v is e,i,u,{e'},I or U
        )
    )

    define i_verb_suffix as setlimit tomark pV for (
        [substring] among (
            '{i^}mes' '{i^}t' '{i^}tes' 'i' 'ie' 'ies' 'ir' 'ira' 'irai'
            'iraIent' 'irais' 'irait' 'iras' 'irent' 'irez' 'iriez'
            'irions' 'irons' 'iront' 'is' 'issaIent' 'issais' 'issait'
            'issant' 'issante' 'issantes' 'issants' 'isse' 'issent' 'isses'
            'issez' 'issiez' 'issions' 'issons' 'it'
                (non-v delete)
        )
    )

    define verb_suffix as setlimit tomark pV for (
        [substring] among (
            'ions'
                (R2 delete)

            '{e'}' '{e'}e' '{e'}es' '{e'}s' '{e`}rent' 'er' 'era' 'erai'
            'eraIent' 'erais' 'erait' 'eras' 'erez' 'eriez' 'erions'
            'erons' 'eront' 'ez' 'iez'

            // 'ons' //-best omitted

                (delete)

            '{a^}mes' '{a^}t' '{a^}tes' 'a' 'ai' 'aIent' 'ais' 'ait' 'ant'
            'ante' 'antes' 'ants' 'as' 'asse' 'assent' 'asses' 'assiez'
            'assions'
                (delete
                 try(['e'] delete)
                )
        )
    )

    define keep_with_s 'aiou{e`}s'

    define residual_suffix as (
        try(['s'] test non-keep_with_s delete)
        setlimit tomark pV for (
            [substring] among(
                'ion'           (R2 's' or 't' delete)
                'ier' 'i{e`}re'
                'Ier' 'I{e`}re' (<-'i')
                'e'             (delete)
                '{e"}'          ('gu' delete)
            )
        )
    )

    define un_double as (
        test among('enn' 'onn' 'ett' 'ell' 'eill') [next] delete
    )

    define un_accent as (
        atleast 1 non-v
        [ '{e'}' or '{e`}' ] <-'e'
    )
)

define stem as (

    do prelude
    do mark_regions
    backwards (

        do (
            (
                 ( standard_suffix or
                   i_verb_suffix or
                   verb_suffix
                 )
                 and
                 try( [ ('Y'   ] <- 'i' ) or
                        ('{c,}'] <- 'c' )
                 )
            ) or
            residual_suffix
        )

        // try(['ent'] RV delete) // is best omitted

        do un_double
        do un_accent
    )
    do postlude
)
